Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-772
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-772 to 79-775 shall be known and may be cited as the Center for Student Leadership and Expanded Learning Act.

Laws 2009, LB476, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 9.